test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-toovaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tōvaz: # Noun 177 'eng /est taevas/fin' - full paradigm
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Nom: tōvaz
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Gen: touvõ
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Par: tōvazt
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Dat: touvõn
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Ins: touvõks
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Ill: [touvõ, touvõz]
     tōvaz+N+Sg+Ela: touvõst
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Nom: touvõd
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Gen: touvõd
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Par: touvidi
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Dat: touvõdõn
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Ins: touvõdõks
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Ill: touviž
     tōvaz+N+Pl+Ela: touvist
